Nebraska, session 109, LB862.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB862 LB862
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 79-2607, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-2607 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Evidence-based reading instruction means instruction in reading
that is in alignment with scientifically based reading research and does
not include the three-cueing system model of reading instruction; and
(b) Three-cueing system model of reading instruction is an approach
to foundational skills instruction that involves the use of three
different types of instructional cues which include semantic, syntactic,
and graphophonic.
(2)(a) The State Department of Education shall develop and implement
a professional learning system to help provide sustained professional
learning and training regarding evidence-based reading instruction for
teachers who teach children from four years of age through third grade at
an approved or accredited school and teachers employed by an early
childhood education program approved by the State Board of Education. The
professional learning system shall include information and tips for
teachers related to helping children and families work with local family
literacy centers to strengthen home and family literacy programs and
better instruct children in reading.
(b) Approved or accredited elementary schools and early childhood
education programs approved by the State Board of Education shall ensure
that teachers who teach children from four years of age through third
grade are aware of the professional learning system and are adequately
trained regarding evidence-based reading instruction to effectively
instruct students in reading.
(3) The State Department of Education shall work with educational
service units to provide regional coaches to approved or accredited
elementary schools to provide assistance and job-embedded training
relating to evidence-based reading instruction to teachers who teach
students in kindergarten through third grade.
-2-

LB862 LB862
2026 2026
(4) On or before September 30 of each year, the Commissioner of
Education shall file a report electronically with the Clerk of the
Legislature relating to the status and use of the professional learning
system implemented pursuant to this section.
(5) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate two million
dollars from the Education Future Fund for each fiscal year beginning
with fiscal year 2024-25 through fiscal year 2029-30 2026-27 to the State
Department of Education to provide regional coaches and job-embedded
training relating to evidence-based reading instruction pursuant to
subsection (2) or (3) of this section.
(6) The State Department of Education may provide technical
assistance as needed to assist school boards in carrying out the Nebraska
Reading Improvement Act.
(7) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out the act.
Sec. 2. Original section 79-2607, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-